Hawaii, session 2025, GM1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the department of
human services administers the supplemental nutrition assistance
program for eligible households that meet income and other
program requirements. The legislature further finds that during
the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic (COVID-19), the department
of human services requested and received approval from the
federal government to waive numerous requirements related to the
processing of supplemental nutrition assistance program
benefits. These waivers allowed the department to quickly
respond to an increased demand for benefits while maintaining a
safe working environment for staff and the public.
Following the end of the COVID-19 pandemic, the United
States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service
2025-3253 HB1099 CDl HMSO

Page 2 1099
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
required states to end waivers and resume normal benefits
processing requirements. From approximately October 2021
through September 2023, Hawaii and other states experienced
increased payment error rates in processing supplemental
nutrition assistance benefits. The increased error rates were
related to the changes in requirements during and following the
COVID-19 pandemic, as well as the high vacancy and turnover
rates for eligibility worker staff.
In June 2024, the United States Department of Agriculture
Food and Nutrition Service assessed the department of human
services a penalty of $10,934,327 for having a supplemental
nutrition assistance program payment error rate above the
national average for two consecutive federal fiscal years.
However, in lieu of paying the total penalty, the United States
Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service provided
the option to the State to reinvest fifty per cent of the
penalty amount in program improvements that would reduce the
payment error rate.
The legislature further finds that the State is pursuing
the reinvestment option to resolve the penalty. The department
of human services plans to reinvest fifty per cent of the
2025-3253 HB1099 CDl HMSO
■niiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
assessed penalty to complete the development of a new
eligibility system, which is anticipated to be completed in late
2025. Notably, under the terms of the reinvestment option, if
the reinvestment results in the payment error rate falling under
and remaining below the national average, which is currently
11.68 per cent, the State will not be required to pay the
remaining fifty per cent of the penalty.
Failure to reinvest fifty per cent of the penalty amount
will result in the total penalty amount needing to be paid.
Additionally, failure to improve error rates may result in
increased financial penalties for the State.
Funding for this reinvestment option is required in fiscal
year 2024-2025 to make necessary modifications to the ongoing
development of the department of human services' new eligibility
system to specifically support automation of eligibility worker
tasks that will increase efficiency and reduce worker errors.
Reinvestment funding is also required this fiscal year to avoid
project delays and ensure that the new system includes the
technical capabilities required to reduce the payment error
rate.
2025-3253 HB1099 CDl HMSO 3
■■lllllllillM

Page 4 H.B. NO.
hTi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to make an emergency
appropriation of $5,467,164 for fiscal year 2024-2025, which is
fifty per cent of the payment error penalty assessed by the
United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition
Service, to the department of human services to support the
necessary modifications to the ongoing development of a new
eligibility system.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,467,164 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be used
to reinvest in the ongoing development of a new eligibility
system that will result in reduced payment error rates.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
human services for the purpose of this Act.
SECTION 4. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and
37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined
that at the beginning of the regular session of 2025, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 was
exceeded by $8,551,795, or one per cent. The appropriations
contained in Act 1, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, caused the
2025-3253 HB1099 CDl HMSO
iniimMiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 5 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by an additional $30,334,159. Therefore, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 has
already been exceeded by $38,885,954, or one per cent.
The appropriation contained in this Act will cause the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by $5,467,164, or one per cent. This
declaration takes into account the additional general fund
appropriation authorized for fiscal year 2024-2025 in this Act
only. The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure
ceiling are that the appropriation made in this Act is necessary
to serve the public interest and to meet the needs addressed by
this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3253 HB1099 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO 1099
X
b
oco
O b
APPROVED this 14th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1099, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1099, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate